Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3254.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [325F.079] PROHIBITION OF ARTIFICIAL FOOD DYES. new text end new text begin A person is prohibited from knowingly selling, offering to sell, or distributing food or food products that contain the following artificial dyes: new text end new text begin (1) Red 3; new text end new text begin (2) Red 40; new text end new text begin (3) Yellow 5; new text end new text begin (4) Yellow 6; new text end new text begin (5) Blue 1; new text end new text begin (6) Blue 2; or new text end new text begin (7) Green 3. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2026. new text end